Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 9

Foreign Limited Partnerships

61-2-901. Law governing.

Subject to the Constitution of Tennessee:

The laws of the jurisdiction under which a foreign limited partnership is organized govern its organization and internal affairs and the liability of its limited partners; and

A foreign limited partnership may not be denied registration by reason of any difference between those laws and the laws of this state.

A foreign limited partnership shall be subject to § 61-2-106.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-902. Registration required — Application.

Before doing business in this state, a foreign limited partnership shall register with the secretary of state. In order to register, a foreign limited partnership shall submit to the secretary of state:

An original copy executed by a general partner of an application for registration as a foreign limited partnership, setting forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership and, if different, the name under which it proposes to register and do business in this state;

The jurisdiction where organized, the date of its organization and a statement from a general partner that, as of the date of filing, the foreign limited partnership validly exists as a limited partnership under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization;

The nature of the business or purposes to be conducted or promoted in this state;

The street address and zip code of its registered office in this state, the county in which that office is located, and the name of its registered agent at that office;

The street address, including the zip code, of its principal office (and a mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office);

The name and business, residence or mailing address and zip code of each of the general partners; and

The date on which the foreign limited partnership first did, or intends to do, business in this state;

The foreign limited partnership shall deliver with the completed application a certificate of existence (or a document of similar import) duly authenticated by the secretary of state or other official having custody of limited partnership records in the jurisdiction under whose law it is formed. The certificate shall not bear a date of more than two (2) months prior to the date the application is filed in this state; and

A fee as set forth in § 61-2-1207(a)(5).

A partnership (general or limited) or corporation formed or organized under the laws of any foreign jurisdiction or the laws of any state other than this state shall not be deemed to be doing business in Tennessee solely by reason of its being a partner in a domestic or registered foreign limited partnership.

If the secretary of state determines upon registration that a foreign limited partnership has been doing business in this state for a period of one (1) year or more prior to applying for registration, then the secretary of state shall require the foreign limited partnership to submit a confirmation of good standing relative to such foreign limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 72, 73; 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 2010, ch. 741, § 54; 2014, ch. 783, § 23.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-801.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-903. Filing of application.

If the secretary of state finds that an application for registration conforms to law and all requisite fees have been paid, he shall file the application in accordance with part 11 of this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-904. Name — Registered office and agent.

A foreign limited partnership may register with the secretary of state under any name (whether or not it is the name under which it is registered in the jurisdiction of its organization) that includes the words “Limited Partnership” or the abbreviation “L.P.” and that could be registered by a domestic limited partnership.

Except as authorized by subsection (c), the name of a foreign limited partnership that registers to do business in this state, shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the respective names of or for every other entity, whether true, assumed, reserved or registered, to the extent the use or reservation of such names is evidenced by a filing with the secretary of state under applicable law.

A foreign limited partnership may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon his records from one (1) or more of the names described in subsection (b). The secretary of state shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking, in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state, to cancel its reservation of such name or change such name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applicant;

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state; or

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents in writing to the use of such name by the applicant, and both the other person and the applicant consent in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to use the same registered agent.

Each foreign limited partnership shall continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office which may but need not be a place of its business in this state; and

A registered agent, which agent may be either an individual resident of this state whose business office is identical with the limited partnership's registered office, or a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state having a business office identical with such registered office.

A foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state may change its registered office or registered agent by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that sets forth:

Its name;

The street address, including the zip code, of its current registered office;

If the current registered office is to be changed, the street address, including the zip code, of its new registered office and the county in which the office is located;

The name of its current registered agent;

If the current registered agent is to be changed, the name of its new registered agent; and

That after the change or changes are made, the street addresses, including zip codes, of its registered office and the business office of its registered agent will be identical.

If a registered agent changes the street address of his business office, he may change the street address of the registered office of any foreign limited partnership for which he is a registered agent by notifying the limited partnership in writing of the change and signing (either manually or in facsimile) and delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of change that complies with the requirements of subsection (e) and recites that the limited partnership has been notified of the change.

Each foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state shall comply with § 61-2-104(e).

The registered agent of a foreign limited partnership may resign his agency appointment by signing and filing with the secretary of state an original statement of resignation accompanied by his certification that he has mailed a copy thereof to the principal office of the limited partnership by certified mail. The statement or resignation may include a statement that the registered office is also discontinued. The agency appointment is terminated, and the registered office discontinued if so provided, on the date on which the statement is filed by the secretary of state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 74; 2010, ch. 743, §§ 13, 14.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-601 — 6-604.

61-2-905. Amended registration.

If any statement required by § 61-2-902 in the application for registration of a foreign limited partnership was false when made or any matter described in the application for registration has changed, making the application false, the foreign limited partnership shall promptly file with the secretary of state an application for an amended registration of a foreign limited partnership. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, a change in the foreign limited partnership's registered agent or registered office can be made by filing a statement of change as provided in § 61-2-904(e). An application for an amended registration need not also be filed. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring an amended registration if the only change in the certificate of foreign limited partnership is related to the admission or substitution of limited partners.

The requirements of § 61-2-902 for obtaining an original registration of a foreign limited partnership apply to obtaining an amended registration under this section.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 75.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-802.

61-2-906. Cancellation of registration.

A foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the secretary of state a certificate of cancellation of registration executed by a general partner, which shall set forth:

The name of the foreign limited partnership, and, if different, the name under which it is registered to do business in Tennessee;

The name of the state or country under whose law it was organized;

That it is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its registration to transact business in this state;

That it either continues its registered agent in this state or revokes the authority of the registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in this state;

A mailing address to which the secretary of state may mail a copy of any process served on him under subdivision (a)(4); and

A commitment to notify the secretary of state in the future of any change in mailing address.

The secretary of state shall file the certificate of cancellation of registration if the secretary of state finds that the certificate of cancellation of registration:

Complies with subsection (a); and

Is accompanied by a tax clearance for termination or withdrawal relative to such foreign limited partnership.

When the certificate of cancellation of registration has been filed in accordance with subsection (b), the cancellation of the certificate of registration of the foreign limited partnership is effective. After cancellation of the registration of the foreign limited partnership is effective, service of process on the secretary of state or the continued registered agent under this section is service on the foreign limited partnership. Upon receipt of process, the secretary of state shall mail a copy of the process to the foreign limited partnership at the mailing address set forth under subdivision (a)(5).

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 76; 2009, ch. 354, §§ 3, 4; 2010, ch. 741, § 55.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-1002.

61-2-907. Doing business without registration — Penalty.

A foreign limited partnership doing business in this state may not maintain any action, suit or proceeding in this state until it has registered in this state and has paid to this state all fees for the years or parts thereof during which it did business in this state without having registered.

The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register in this state does not impair:

The validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited partnership;

The right of any other party to the contract to maintain any action, suit or proceeding on the contract; or

The foreign limited partnership from defending any action, suit or proceeding in any court of this state.

A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable as a general partner of the foreign limited partnership solely by reason of the limited partnership having done business in this state without registration.

Any foreign limited partnership doing business in this state without first having registered shall be fined and shall pay to the secretary of state two hundred dollars ($200) for each year or part thereof during which the foreign limited partnership failed to register in this state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-908. Enjoined from doing business.

The court of record shall have jurisdiction to enjoin any foreign limited partnership, or any agent thereof, from doing any business in this state if such foreign limited partnership has failed to register under this part or if such foreign limited partnership has secured a certificate from the secretary of state under § 61-2-903 on the basis of false or misleading representations. The attorney general shall, upon his own motion or upon the relation of proper parties, proceed for this purpose by complaint in any county in which such foreign limited partnership is doing or has done business.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-909. Other provisions applicable.

Sections 61-2-204(c) and 61-2-207 shall be applicable to foreign limited partnerships as if they were domestic limited partnerships.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-910. Service of process.

The registered agent of a foreign limited partnership authorized to transact business in this state is the limited partnership's agent for service of process, notice or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the foreign limited partnership.

Service on a limited partnership when the secretary of state is its agent for service of process may be obtained pursuant to § 61-2-106.

This section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, for serving a foreign limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 77.